Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201523-317
Levees; dikes; special assessments; entry on tax list; lien.

The board of supervisors or county commissioners shall cause the special assessment made upon the lands benefited as provided in section 23-316 to be entered upon the tax lists of the county as provided in cases of special assessments, which assessment shall constitute a lien on the real estate respectively assessed and shall be collected as other special assessments are collected. One-tenth of each assessment shall be collected each year for a period of ten years with interest at the rate of seven percent per annum on deferred payments, unless paid in full as herein provided.

Laws 1921, c. 269, § 9, p. 896;

C.S.1922, § 1034;

C.S.1929, § 26-728;

R.S.1943, § 23-317;

Laws 2015, LB361, § 48.
August 30, 2015